District of Columbia statutes.
29-604.03

Form of contribution.

A contribution may consist of property transferred, services performed, or other benefit provided to the partnership or an agreement to transfer property, perform services, or provide another benefit.

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(4)(D), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-601.02, § 29-601.04, and § 29-604.08.

Editor's Notes

Section 2(f)(4)(C) of D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-604.03 as § 29-604.06.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.